dictionaries/fi_FI/src/hunspell/fi_FI.aff
SFX X   0     nikäänkö    vä
SFX X   0     niköhän     vä
SFX X   0     nipähän     vä
SFX X   0     sikin       vä
SFX X   0     sikään      vä
SFX X   0     sikö        vä
SFX X   0     sipä        vä
SFX X   0     sihän       vä
SFX X   0     sikinkö     vä
SFX X   0     sikäänkö    vä
SFX X   0     siköhän     vä
SFX X   0     sipähän     vä
SFX X   0     nsäkin      vä
SFX X   0     nsäkään     vä
SFX X   0     nsäkö       vä
SFX X   0     nsäpä       vä
SFX X   0     nsähän      vä
SFX X   0     nsäkinkö    vä
SFX X   0     nsäkäänkö   vä
SFX X   0     nsäköhän    vä
SFX X   0     nsäpähän    vä
SFX X   0     mmekin      vä
SFX X   0     mmekään     vä
SFX X   0     mmekö       vä
SFX X   0     mmepä       vä
SFX X   0     mmehän      vä
SFX X   0     mmekinkö    vä
SFX X   0     mmekäänkö   vä
SFX X   0     mmeköhän    vä
SFX X   0     mmepähän    vä
SFX X   0     nnekin      vä
SFX X   0     nnekään     vä
SFX X   0     nnekö       vä
SFX X   0     nnepä       vä
SFX X   0     nnehän      vä
SFX X   0     nnekinkö    vä
SFX X   0     nnekäänkö   vä
SFX X   0     nneköhän    vä
SFX X   0     nnepähän    vä
SFX X   0     änikin      vä
SFX X   0     änikään     vä
SFX X   0     änikö       vä
SFX X   0     änipä       vä
SFX X   0     änihän      vä
SFX X   0     änikinkö    vä
SFX X   0     änikäänkö   vä
SFX X   0     äniköhän    vä
SFX X   0     änipähän    vä
SFX X   0     äsikin      vä
SFX X   0     äsikään     vä
SFX X   0     äsikö       vä
SFX X   0     äsipä       vä
SFX X   0     äsihän      vä
SFX X   0     äsikinkö    vä
SFX X   0     äsikäänkö   vä
SFX X   0     äsiköhän    vä
SFX X   0     äsipähän    vä
SFX X   0     änsäkin     vä
SFX X   0     änsäkään    vä
SFX X   0     änsäkö      vä
SFX X   0     änsäpä      vä
SFX X   0     änsähän     vä
SFX X   0     änsäkinkö   vä
SFX X   0     änsäkäänkö  vä
SFX X   0     änsäköhän   vä
SFX X   0     änsäpähän   vä
SFX X   0     ämmekin     vä
SFX X   0     ämmekään    vä
SFX X   0     ämmekö      vä
SFX X   0     ämmepä      vä
SFX X   0     ämmehän     vä
SFX X   0     ämmekinkö   vä
SFX X   0     ämmekäänkö  vä
SFX X   0     ämmeköhän   vä
SFX X   0     ämmepähän   vä
SFX X   0     ännekin     vä
SFX X   0     ännekään    vä
SFX X   0     ännekö      vä
SFX X   0     ännepä      vä
SFX X   0     ännehän     vä
SFX X   0     ännekinkö   vä
SFX X   0     ännekäänkö  vä
SFX X   0     änneköhän   vä
SFX X   0     ännepähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iänikin     vä
SFX X   ä     iänikään    vä
SFX X   ä     iänikö      vä
SFX X   ä     iänipä      vä
SFX X   ä     iänihän     vä
SFX X   ä     iänikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     iänikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iäniköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     iänipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iäsikin     vä
SFX X   ä     iäsikään    vä
SFX X   ä     iäsikö      vä
SFX X   ä     iäsipä      vä
SFX X   ä     iäsihän     vä
SFX X   ä     iäsikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     iäsikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iäsiköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     iäsipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäkin    vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäkään   vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäkö     vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäpä     vä
SFX X   ä     iänsähän    vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäkinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäkäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iänsäpähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iämmekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iämmekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iämmekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iämmepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iämmehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iämmekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iämmekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iämmeköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iämmepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iännekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iännekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iännekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iännepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iännehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iännekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iännekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iänneköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iännepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     ienikin     vä
SFX X   ä     ienikään    vä
SFX X   ä     ienikö      vä
SFX X   ä     ienipä      vä
SFX X   ä     ienihän     vä
SFX X   ä     ienikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     ienikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     ieniköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     ienipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iesikin     vä
SFX X   ä     iesikään    vä
SFX X   ä     iesikö      vä
SFX X   ä     iesipä      vä
SFX X   ä     iesihän     vä
SFX X   ä     iesikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     iesikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iesiköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     iesipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iensäkin    vä
SFX X   ä     iensäkään   vä
SFX X   ä     iensäkö     vä
SFX X   ä     iensäpä     vä
SFX X   ä     iensähän    vä
SFX X   ä     iensäkinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iensäkäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iensäköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iensäpähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iemmekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iemmekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iemmekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iemmepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iemmehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iemmekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iemmekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iemmeköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iemmepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iennekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iennekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iennekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iennepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iennehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iennekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iennekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     ienneköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iennepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iinikin     vä
SFX X   ä     iinikään    vä
SFX X   ä     iinikö      vä
SFX X   ä     iinipä      vä
SFX X   ä     iinihän     vä
SFX X   ä     iinikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     iinikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iiniköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     iinipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iisikin     vä
SFX X   ä     iisikään    vä
SFX X   ä     iisikö      vä
SFX X   ä     iisipä      vä
SFX X   ä     iisihän     vä
SFX X   ä     iisikinkö   vä
SFX X   ä     iisikäänkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iisiköhän   vä
SFX X   ä     iisipähän   vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäkin    vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäkään   vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäkö     vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäpä     vä
SFX X   ä     iinsähän    vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäkinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäkäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iinsäpähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iimmekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iimmekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iimmekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iimmepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iimmehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iimmekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iimmekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iimmeköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iimmepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     iinnekin    vä
SFX X   ä     iinnekään   vä
SFX X   ä     iinnekö     vä
SFX X   ä     iinnepä     vä
SFX X   ä     iinnehän    vä
SFX X   ä     iinnekinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     iinnekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     iinneköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     iinnepähän  vä
SFX X   ä     inenikin    vä
SFX X   ä     inenikään   vä
SFX X   ä     inenikö     vä
SFX X   ä     inenipä     vä
SFX X   ä     inenihän    vä
SFX X   ä     inenikinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     inenikäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     ineniköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     inenipähän  vä
SFX X   ä     inesikin    vä
SFX X   ä     inesikään   vä
SFX X   ä     inesikö     vä
SFX X   ä     inesipä     vä
SFX X   ä     inesihän    vä
SFX X   ä     inesikinkö  vä
SFX X   ä     inesikäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     inesiköhän  vä
SFX X   ä     inesipähän  vä
SFX X   ä     inensäkin   vä
SFX X   ä     inensäkään  vä
SFX X   ä     inensäkö    vä
SFX X   ä     inensäpä    vä
SFX X   ä     inensähän   vä
SFX X   ä     inensäkinkö vä
SFX X   ä     inensäkäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     inensäköhän vä
SFX X   ä     inensäpähän vä
SFX X   ä     inemmekin   vä
SFX X   ä     inemmekään  vä
SFX X   ä     inemmekö    vä
SFX X   ä     inemmepä    vä
SFX X   ä     inemmehän   vä
SFX X   ä     inemmekinkö vä
SFX X   ä     inemmekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     inemmeköhän vä
SFX X   ä     inemmepähän vä
SFX X   ä     inennekin   vä
SFX X   ä     inennekään  vä
SFX X   ä     inennekö    vä
SFX X   ä     inennepä    vä
SFX X   ä     inennehän   vä
SFX X   ä     inennekinkö vä
SFX X   ä     inennekäänkö vä
SFX X   ä     inenneköhän vä
SFX X   ä     inennepähän vä
SFX X   vä    mässänikin  vä
SFX X   vä    mässänikään vä
SFX X   vä    mässänikö   vä
SFX X   vä    mässänipä   vä
SFX X   vä    mässänihän  vä
SFX X   vä    mässänikinkö vä
SFX X   vä    mässänikäänkö vä
SFX X   vä    mässäniköhän vä
SFX X   vä    mässänipähän vä
SFX X   vä    mässäsikin  vä
SFX X   vä    mässäsikään vä
